Utah statutes.
77-15a-101.   Mentally retarded defendant not subject to death penalty --
Defendant with subaverage functioning not subject to death penalty if
confession not corroborated.
(1)  A defendant who is found by the court to be mentally retarded as defined
in Section 77-15a-102 is not subject to the death penalty.
(2)  A defendant who does not meet the definition of mental retardation under
Section 77-15a-102 is not subject to the death penalty if:
(a)  the defendant has significantly subaverage general intellectual
functioning that exists concurrently with significant deficiencies in adaptive
functioning;
(b)  the functioning described in Subsection (2)(a) is manifested prior to age
22; and
(c)  the state intends to introduce into evidence a confession by the
defendant which is not supported by substantial evidence independent of the
confession.
